da: Kompatibelt træ: Ibenholt; Laurbær; Ahorn (behandlet); Ahorn (ubehandlet); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/komposit; Palisander; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilno drvo: Ebanovina; Lovor; Javor (obrađen); Javor (neobrađen); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite / kompozit; Palisandar; Ostalo
fi: Yhteensopiva puu: Eebenpuu; Laakeripuu; Vaahtera (pintakäsitelty); Vaahtera (pintakäsittelemätön); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/komposiitti; Ruusupuu; Muu
zh-TW: 相容木材: 黑檀木; 月桂木; 楓木 (已塗裝); 楓木 (未塗裝); 歐凡寇木; 保羅鐵木; Richlite/複合材料; 玫瑰木; 其他
en: Compatible wood: Ebony; Laurel; Maple (finished); Maple (unfinished); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/composite; Rosewood; Other
th: ไม้ที่เหมาะสม: ไม้อีโบนี; ลอเรล; เมเปิล (เคลือบผิว); เมเปิล (ไม่เคลือบผิว); โอวังก์กอล; เปาเฟอร์โร; ริชไลต์/วัสดุคอมโพสิต; โรสวูด; อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibelt trä: Ebenholts; Lagerträ; Lönn (ytbehandlad); Lönn (obehandlad); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/komposit; Rosenträ; Annat
nl: Compatibele houtsoort: Ebbenhout; Laurier; Esdoorn (afgewerkt); Esdoorn (onafgewerkt); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/composiet; Palissander; Overig
es: Madera compatible: Ébano; Laurel; Arce (acabado); Arce (sin acabado); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/compuesto; Palo de rosa; Otra
de: Kompatibles Holz: Ebenholz; Lorbeer; Ahorn (behandelt); Ahorn (unbehandelt); Ovangkol; Pau Ferro; Richlite/Verbundstoff; Palisander; Sonstige
ja: 対応ウッド: エボニー; ローレル; メイプル (仕上げ済み); メイプル (未仕上げ); オバンコール; パーフェロー; リッチライト / 複合材; ローズウッド; その他
it: Legno compatibile: Ebano; Alloro; Acero (finito); Acero (grezzo); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/composito; Palissandro; Altro
bg-BG: Съвместима дървесина: Абанос; Лаврово дърво; Клен (обработен); Клен (необработен); Ованкол; Пау феро; Ричлайт/композит; Палисандър; Друго
tr: Uyumlu ahşap: Abanoz; Defne; Akçaağaç (cilalı); Akçaağaç (cilasız); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/kompozit; Gül ağacı; Diğer
pt-PT: Madeira compatível: Ébano; Loureiro; Ácer (com acabamento); Ácer (sem acabamento); Ovangkol; Pau-ferro; Richlite/compósito; Pau-rosa; Outra
pl: Zgodne drewno: Heban; Wawrzyn; Klon (wykończony); Klon (surowy); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite / kompozyt; Palisander; Inne
pt-BR: Madeira compatível: Ébano; Louro; Maple (com acabamento); Maple (sem acabamento); Ovangkol; Pau-ferro; Richlite/composto; Jacarandá; Outro
fr: Bois compatible: Ébène; Laurier; Érable (fini); Érable (brut); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/composite; Palissandre; Autre
nb: Kompatibelt treverk: Ibenholt; Laurbærtre; Lønn (behandlet); Lønn (ubehandlet); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/kompositt; Palisander; Annet
lt-LT: Suderinama mediena: Juodmedis; Lauramedis; Klevas (su apdaila); Klevas (be apdailos); Ovangkolas; Pau ferro; „Richlite“ / kompozitas; Palisandras; Kita
sl-SI: Združljiv les: Ebenovina; Lovor; Javor (obdelan); Javor (neobdelan); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/kompozit; Palisander; Drugo
cs: Vhodné druhy dřeva: Eben; Vavřín; Javor (s povrchovou úpravou); Javor (bez povrchové úpravy); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/kompozit; Palisandr; Jiné
vi: Gỗ tương thích: Gỗ mun; Nguyệt quế; Phong (đã hoàn thiện); Phong (chưa hoàn thiện); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/composite; Cẩm lai; Khác
zh-CN: 适用木材: 黑檀木; 月桂木; 枫木（已涂装）; 枫木（未涂装）; 欧文科木; 保罗铁木; Richlite/复合材料; 玫瑰木; 其他
ko: 호환 목재: 에보니; 로렐; 메이플(마감 처리됨); 메이플(미마감); 오방콜; 파우 페로; 리치라이트/복합재; 로즈우드; 기타
ru: Совместимая древесина: Черное дерево; Лавр; Клён (обработанный); Клён (необработанный); Овангкол; Пау-ферро; Ричлайт / композит; Палисандр; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis fa: Ébenfa; Babérfa; Juharfa (kezelt); Juharfa (kezeletlen); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/kompozit; Rózsafa; Egyéb
el: Συμβατό ξύλο: Έβενος; Δάφνη; Σφένδαμος (φινιρισμένος); Σφένδαμος (μη φινιρισμένος); Οβανγκόλ; Πάου φέρο; Richlite/Σύνθετο υλικό; Παλίσανδρος; Άλλο
ro-RO: Lemn compatibil: Abanos; Dafin; Arțar (finisat); Arțar (nefinisat); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/compozit; Palisandru; Altele
sk-SK: Kompatibilné drevo: Eben; Vavrín; Javor (povrchovo upravený); Javor (neupravený); Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Richlite/kompozit; Palisander; Iné